Illinois, session 104th, SB3305.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Food Handling Regulation Enforcement Act is 5amended by changing Section 3.08 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 625/3.08)7    Sec. 3.08. Food allergy awareness.8    (a) A restaurant shall display a notice indicating to 9consumers that any information regarding food allergies must 10be communicated to an employee of the restaurant.11    (a-5) A restaurant shall display a notice for each menu 12item indicating to consumers the major food allergens that the 13restaurant knows or reasonably should know are contained as 14ingredients in the menu item. The restaurant may provide the 15notice either directly on the restaurant's menu or in a 16digital format. If the restaurant provides the information 17directly on the restaurant's menu, each menu item shall be 18followed by a written statement below or immediately adjacent 19to the menu item indicating the major food allergens contained 20in the menu item. If the restaurant provides the information 21in a digital format, such as through a quick response code that 22links to the restaurant's digital menu, the restaurant shall 23have an alternative method to provide the information to   SB3305- 2 -LRB104 19034 TRT 32479 b1consumers who are not able to access the information in the 2digital format. The notice required under this Section shall 3either use the common or usual names of the major food 4allergens or standardized images to communicate the presence 5of the major food allergens in menu items. The Department of 6Public Health or the health department of a unit of local 7government may evaluate a restaurant's compliance with this 8subsection by visually verifying the presence of the required 9allergen notice or through other reasonable methods of 10verification consistent with the intent of this subsection. 11This subsection (a-5) does not alter any duty that a 12restaurant may have under existing law to reasonably ensure 13the safety of consumers.14    (b) An employee of a restaurant who receives allergy 15information from a consumer shall communicate the consumer's 16information to the restaurant's person in charge or the 17certified food protection manager on duty. 18    (c) A restaurant meets the requirements of this Section if 19the restaurant displays a notice regarding food allergies or 20provides a statement regarding food allergies on its menu that 21was approved in another state before the effective date of 22this amendatory Act of the 104th 101st General Assembly in 23accordance with subsection (a) and if the restaurant displays 24a notice regarding major food allergens in each menu item in 25accordance with subsection (a-5).26    (d) A multi-state business or a franchisee, as that term   SB3305- 3 -LRB104 19034 TRT 32479 b1is defined in the Franchise Disclosure Act of 1987, meets the 2requirements of this Section if the multi-state business or 3franchisee has an internal policy that requires a notice 4regarding allergies to be displayed or a statement regarding 5food allergies to be provided on the menu in accordance with 6subsection (a) and if the multi-state business or franchisee 7requires the display of a notice of major food allergens for 8each menu item in accordance with subsection (a-5).9    (e) On or before January 1, 2020, the Department of Public 10Health shall create and make available on its website for 11download the notice required to be displayed under subsection 12(a) of this Section.13    (f) As used in this Section: 14    "Alternative method" includes, but is not limited to, a 15separate allergen-specific menu, an allergen chart, an 16allergen grid, an allergen booklet, or other written 17materials. 18    "Major food allergen" includes milk, eggs, fish, 19crustaceans, tree nuts, wheat, peanuts, soybeans, sesame, and 20food ingredients that contain protein derived from these 21foods. 22    From the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 23101st General Assembly through July 1, 2020, enforcement of 24this Section shall be limited to education and notification of 25the requirements of this Section to encourage compliance. 26(Source: P.A. 101-495, eff. 8-23-19.)